Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.505.050

Budget—Notice of meeting to adopt.

(1) Upon completion of their budgets as provided in RCW 28A.505.040, every school district shall publish a notice stating that the board of directors will meet for the purpose of fixing and adopting the budget of the district for the ensuing fiscal year.

(2) Such notice shall designate the date, time, and place of said meeting which shall occur no later than the thirty-first day of August for first-class school districts, and the first day of August for second-class school districts.

(3) The notice shall also state that any person may appear at the meeting and be heard for or against any part of such budget, the four-year budget plan, or any proposed changes to uses of enrichment funding under RCW 28A.505.240. The notice shall be electronically published and published at least once each week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the district, or, if there be none, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties in which such district is a part. The last notice shall be published no later than seven days immediately prior to the hearing.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 605; 1995 c 121 s 2; 1990 c 33 s 417; 1983 c 59 s 3; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 5. Formerly RCW 28A.65.420.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 ss 604, 605, and 606: See note following RCW 28A.505.040.

Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13: See note following RCW 28A.150.410.

Effective date—1995 c 121: See note following RCW 28A.505.040.

Application—Effective date—Severability—1983 c 59: See notes following RCW 28A.505.010.

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118: See note following RCW 28A.505.010.